src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-algg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - algg â-stem : # Noun 'beginning/alku' - full paradigm
     algg+N+Sg+Nom: algg
     algg+N+Sg+Gen: aalǥ
     algg+N+Sg+Acc: aalǥ
     algg+N+Sg+Ill: aʹlǧǧe
     algg+N+Sg+Loc: aalǥâst
     algg+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [alǥstan, aalǥstan]
     algg+N+Sg+Com: aalǥin
     algg+N+Ess: alggân
     algg+N+Par: alggâd
     algg+N+Sg+Abe: [aalǥtaa, aalǥtää]
     algg+N+Pl+Nom: aalǥ
     algg+N+Pl+Gen: aalǥi
     algg+N+Pl+Acc: aalǥid
     algg+N+Pl+Ill: aalǥid
     algg+N+Pl+Loc: aalǥin
     algg+N+Pl+Com: aalǥivuiʹm
     algg+N+Pl+Abe: [aalǥitaa, aalǥitää]
     algg+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: aalǥâž
     algg+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen: aaʹlje
